Utah statutes.
11-13-314.   Eminent domain authority of certain commercial project
entities.
(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2), a commercial project entity that existed
as a project entity before January 1, 1980 may, with respect to a project or
facilities providing additional project capacity in which the commercial
project entity has an interest, acquire property within the state through
eminent domain, subject to restrictions imposed by Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part
5, Eminent Domain, and general law for the protection of other communities.
(b)  Subsection (1)(a) may not be construed to:
(i)  give a project entity the authority to acquire water rights by eminent
domain; or
(ii)  diminish any other authority a project entity may claim to have under
the law to acquire property by eminent domain.
(2)  Each project entity that intends to acquire property by eminent domain
under Subsection (1)(a) shall, upon the first contact with the owner of the
property sought to be acquired, deliver to the owner a copy of a booklet or
other materials provided by the property rights ombudsman, created under
Section 13-43-201, dealing with the property owner's rights in an eminent
domain proceeding.
